Washington statutes.
RCW 43.115.060

Relationships with local government and private industry.

In carrying out its duties the commission may establish such relationships with local governments and private industry as may be needed to promote equal opportunity for Hispanics in government, education and employment.

[ 1987 c 249 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 34 s 6.]